Maryland, session 2026, HB0874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–202.
(a) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Governor shall appoint [three] FIVE members to the Board.
– 1 –

Ch. 830 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The appointments shall be made:
(i) if the Senate is in session, with the advice and consent of the
Senate; or
(ii) if the Senate is not in session, by the Governor alone, SUBJECT
TO THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE WHEN THE SENATE NEXT CONVENES.
(3) (I) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THE MEMBERS OF THE
BOARD FROM A LIST OF INDIVIDUALS RECOMMENDED BY THE MEMBERS OF THE
COUNTY HOUSE AND SENATE DELEGATIONS TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(II) THE GOVERNOR MAY REQUEST A NEW LIST OF
RECOMMENDATIONS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AT ANY TIME.
(b) (1) Each member of the Board shall be:
(i) a resident and voter of the county; and
(ii) an individual of high character and integrity and of recognized
business capacity.
(2) No more than [two] THREE members of the Board may belong to the
same political party.
(3) NO MORE THAN TWO MEMBERS OF THE BOARD MAY BE
RESIDENTS OF THE SAME STATE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
11–210.
THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT AND PUBLISH A WRITTEN POLICY RELATED TO
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST AND THE RECUSAL OF BOARD MEMBERS FROM BOARD
MATTERS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the initial terms of the two
additional members of the Board of License Commissioners for Anne Arundel County, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall begin May 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –